Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.150

Allocation of property tax revenues.

(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the creation of a local infrastructure project area by a sponsoring city, the county treasurer must distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located in the local infrastructure project area as follows:

(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring city must receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the property tax allocation revenue base value for that local infrastructure project area in the taxing district; and

(b) The sponsoring city must receive an additional portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue value within the local infrastructure project area. However, if there is no property tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring city may not receive any additional regular property taxes under this subsection (1)(b). The sponsoring city may agree to receive less than the full amount of the additional portion of regular property taxes under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax receipts must be allocated to the participating taxing districts that levied regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes levied for them, in the local infrastructure project area for collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The sponsoring city may request that the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the sponsoring local government or its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to pay or finance public improvement costs within the local infrastructure project area.

(2) The county assessor must determine the property tax allocation revenue value and property tax allocation revenue base value. This section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.

(3)(a) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenue to the sponsoring city must cease on the date that is the earlier of:

(i) The date when local property tax allocation revenues are no longer used or obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements; or

(ii) The final termination date as determined under (b) of this subsection.

(b) The final termination date is determined as follows:

(i) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection (3)(b), if the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that the local property tax threshold level 1 is met, the final termination date is ten years after the date of the first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under subsection (1) of this section;

(ii) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that the local property tax threshold level 2 is met at least six months prior to the final termination date under (b)(i) of this subsection (3), the final termination date is fifteen years after the date of the first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under subsection (1) of this section;

(iii) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that the local property tax threshold level 3 is met at least six months prior to the final termination date under (b)(ii) of this subsection (3), the final termination date is twenty years after the date of the first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under subsection (1) of this section;

(iv) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that the local property tax threshold level 4 is met at least six months prior to the final termination date under (b)(iii) of this subsection (3), the final termination date is twenty-five years after the date of the first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) The "local property tax threshold level 1" is met when the sponsoring city has either:

(i) Issued building permits for development within the local infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least twenty-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or

(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least twenty-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.

(b) The "local property tax threshold level 2" is met when the sponsoring city has either:

(i) Issued building permits for development within the local infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least fifty percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or

(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least fifty percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.

(c) The "local property tax threshold level 3" is met when the sponsoring city has either:

(i) Issued building permits for development within the local infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least seventy-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or

(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least seventy-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.

(d) The "local property tax threshold level 4" is met when the sponsoring city has either:

(i) Issued building permits for development within the local infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least one hundred percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or

(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least one hundred percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.

(5) Any excess local property tax allocation revenues, and earnings on the revenues, remaining at the time the distribution of local property tax allocation revenue terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the local infrastructure project area for collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection that year.

(6) The allocation to local infrastructure project financing of that portion of the sponsoring city's and each participating taxing district's regular property taxes levied upon the property tax allocation revenue value within that local infrastructure project area is declared to be a public purpose of and benefit to the sponsoring city and each participating taxing district.

(7) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under this section may not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of taxes levied by or within any sponsoring local government and participating taxing district or the consistency of any such levies with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

[ 2011 c 318 s 701.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.